Utah statutes.
20A-5-206.   Change of precinct boundaries -- Revising list.
(1)  Whenever the boundaries of any voting precinct are changed, or a new
voting precinct is created, the county clerk shall ensure that the names of
all voters residing within the territory affected by  the change are
transferred from one official register to the other.
(2)  Any registered voter whose name has been erroneously transferred from one
official register to another, or erroneously allowed to remain on any official
register, may vote in the voting precinct in which he resides if he:
(a)  signs the registration affidavit; and
(b)  presents sufficient proof to the election judges that his name does not
appear on the official register because of an error.
